California, session 20252026, SB756.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14998.14 is added to the Government Code, to read:14998.14. (a) The California Film Commission shall integrate additional data collection requirements described in this section into the motion picture tax credit framework, as specified in Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 17053.98.1, 23685, 23695, 23698, and 23698.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and this chapter, including the existing diversity workplan, interim assessment, and final assessment requirements, without establishing a separate compliance program.(b) The additional data collection to be integrated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:(1) Demographic data currently not required for all hired employees, including disability status, veteran status, and where voluntarily provided, LGBTQ+ status.(2) Aggregate ZIP Code hiring data voluntarily reported by credit recipients for the purpose of assessing local workforce impacts.(3) Apprenticeship and trainee utilization reports demonstrating the inclusion of underrepresented groups in film production trades and related industries.(c) (1) The commission, in consultation with industry stakeholders, payroll companies, and subject matter experts, to ensure clarity, feasibility, and practical implementation, shall adopt definitions, reporting templates, and narrowly tailored metrics for the additional data collection required under this section.(2) The commission shall develop data collection protocols to reduce nonresponse rates and improve disaggregation of “Multiple” or “Other” categories that recognize that high rates of unreported or aggregated responses limit meaningful analysis.(3) Where feasible, workforce demographic and wage and hours data required under this section may be reported in aggregate using certified payroll data or verified third-party payroll reports submitted by the production or its payroll service provider. The commission shall work with industry stakeholders and payroll companies to develop standardized templates that align with existing payroll reporting systems, ensure data accuracy, and protect individual employee privacy.(4) In developing reporting templates and evaluation metrics under this section, the commission shall consider both proportional representation relative to the California general population and historic and national-level underrepresentation in the film and entertainment industries.(d) The commission shall address noncompliance with data collection requirements under this section solely through the existing enforcement conditions and procedures of the motion picture tax credits. This section does not create new monetary penalties, independent enforcement mechanisms, or authorize a reduction in the amount allocated or allowed for a motion picture tax credit.(e) The commission shall publish an annual compliance report, in accordance with Section 9795, summarizing the collected data, trends in diversity and economic impact, and recommendations for improvements in the motion picture tax credit framework. The report shall be made publicly available on the commission’s website.(f) This section shall become operative upon an appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of the program.